California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) Award grants to state agencies, cities, counties, resource conservation districts, and park and recreation districts for the purpose of acquiring sites identified as necessary for park, recreation, or conservation purposes and for development of essential related public facilities.

(d) Acquire, or award grants or make interest-free loans to other state agencies, cities, counties, resource conservation districts, and recreation and park districts for the purpose of acquiring, sites identified as necessary for park, recreation, or conservation purposes, when a state or local agency is unable, due to limited financial resources or other circumstances of a temporary nature, to acquire the site. Priority shall be given under this subdivision to sites under immediate development pressure. Fee title and options to purchase may be acquired and the land may be held for subsequent conveyance to the appropriate public agency if the conservancy finds that the site would otherwise be lost to public use. Repayment of any loans or other reimbursements to the conservancy for projects funded from the federal grant account of the fund under this subdivision shall be deposited in the account and may be used for the purposes of this division when authorized by the Secretary of the Interior.

(e) Award grants to cities, counties, or state agencies for the purpose of enhancing of resources which, because of improper location of improvements, or incompatible land uses, have suffered loss of natural and scenic values. Grants under this subdivision shall be utilized for the assembly of parcels of land to improve resource management, for relocation of improperly located or designated improvements, and for other corrective measures which will enhance the natural and scenic character. Grants under this subdivision may not be utilized as a method of acquisition of public park, wildlife, or natural areas, except as such uses may be incidental.

(f) The conservancy may act pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section only if it finds that the local regulatory provisions do not adequately accomplish the objectives of such subdivisions.

The conservancy may act pursuant to subdivisions (a), (c), and (e) of this section only if the project is not a more intense land use than is consistent with the local area and general plans of the city or county having jurisdiction over the affected land. The conservancy may undertake a project itself or award a grant or make a loan pursuant to subdivision (b) only if it notifies the governing body of the city or county in whose jurisdiction the project is located and the governing body has not, by a four-fifths vote, disapproved the project. If the governing body does not disapprove a project within 45 days after receiving notice of the project proposal from the conservancy, the project shall be deemed approved by the governing body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1616, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.2.

(a) The conservancy may award grants to nonprofit organizations qualified as exempt organizations under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), and private educational institutions that file the statement with the Superintendent of Public Instruction required by Section 33190 of the Education Code, to carry out improvements, maintenance, acquisitions, or educational interpretation programs that directly relate to a project that the conservancy is otherwise authorized to undertake pursuant to this division.

(b) Grants awarded pursuant to this section are subject to the review and approval of the Department of General Services. The conservancy shall not award a grant under this section for a project that is not for the purposes specified in subdivision (a). No nonprofit organization may expend any portion of a grant to engage in any activity not expressly authorized pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The executive director shall submit a notice to the Department of Finance 30 days prior to award of a grant under this section. The notice shall specify the recipient organization, the amount to be granted, and the purposes for which the grant is awarded. The period for notice under this subdivision may be concurrent with the review of the Department of General Services under subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.27.

(a) The conservancy may award grants to school districts and other local agencies for any of the purposes for which it may award grants to nonprofit organizations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 33204.2.

(b) Grants awarded to school districts pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to both of the following conditions:

(1) The grants shall not include cash grants of state funds.

(2) Grants permitting the use of facilities shall be limited to facilities that are owned by the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The existing parks and open space owned by federal, state, and local agencies within the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor, as defined in Section 33105.5, are important recreational and environmental resources for the people of California, especially residents of the San Fernando, La Cresenta, and San Gabriel Valleys, and it is in the public interest to facilitate the connection of existing parks and open-space resources and to provide for further improvement of underutilized public easements and other existing public open spaces.

(2) There is a need for overall trail and recreational access planning and coordination between the 11 local agencies, two joint powers park agencies, two state agencies, and three federal agencies with jurisdiction over lands in the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor.

(b) The conservancy, using the voluntary cooperation of governmental jurisdictions within the corridor, shall prepare and adopt a coordinated trail development plan and recreational access program for the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor that includes, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of major hiking and equestrian trails and important secondary and feeder trails that cross jurisdictional lines, and a priority program for improving those trails.

(2) Identification of special purpose trails, where appropriate, for special population groups and special user groups, such as mountain bicycles where the special purpose trails will have no significant environmental impact.

(3) Identification of, and a priority program for implementing, those additional recreation access needs, including new or expanded trails that should be added to the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor, and additional or upgraded facilities, parks, or open spaces that may be necessary.

(4) Identification of underused existing public open spaces and recommendations for providing better public use and enjoyment of these areas.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 33105.5, the conservancy may make minor boundary changes to the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor solely for the purpose of implementing the plan prepared pursuant to this section. Any boundary change shall be in the form of maps and descriptions which shall be included in the plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (d) and shall be filed with the Secretary of State not later than July 31, 1990.

(d) The conservancy shall hold at least one public hearing in each city and the unincorporated area of each county within the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor prior to the submission of the plan and program pursuant to this subdivision. The plan and program prepared under subdivision (b), and any changes to the corridor boundary, shall be coordinated with each affected jurisdiction prior to adoption by the conservancy. The plan and program shall be submitted to the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Wildlife at least 30 days prior to the approval of any acquisition or improvement under the plan or program pursuant to this division, but not later than June 30, 1990.

(e) Upon adoption by a local government of the plan and program prepared under this section, the plan and program shall be part of the plan that the local government implements for purposes of compliance with Section 33009.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1062, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The boundary of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor should be determined exclusively upon the best scientific and resource-based information regarding trail, recreational, and environmental resources in the area.

(2) Landowners, local government entities, members of the public, and other affected parties should be afforded maximum participation in the process by which the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor is delineated.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 33105.5, if the conservancy determines,
 based on relevant scientific information and land use planning studies, and after holding at least one public hearing in the area that would be affected by a revision of the boundaries of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor, that a boundary revision in the vicinity of the City of Santa Clarita, including Whitney Canyon, Elsmere Canyon, and their adjacent watersheds, is necessary, the executive director shall prepare and file with the Secretary of State, the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, a revised map showing the changes in the boundaries of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor.

(2) A revised map prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be supported by relevant scientific information and be in accordance with the purposes and objectives of Section 33204.3.

(3) (A) An owner of property located
 in Elsmere Canyon, at any time, may request of the conservancy, in writing, that his or her property be included within the boundaries of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor. Upon receipt of the request, the conservancy may, in accordance with the procedures prescribed in paragraphs (1) and (2), revise the map showing the boundaries of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor to include within the corridor the property in Elsmere Canyon that is the subject of the request.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not affect the inclusion of the property in the corridor pursuant to other provisions of this section or other provisions of law.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 33201, this section does not affect the jurisdiction of the State Coastal Conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (AB 110)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.5.

(a) The conservancy shall conduct a study and implement a program to provide recreational access from downtown Los Angeles and the inner city to the zone in order to provide recreational opportunities for all income and ethnic groups wishing to enjoy the Santa Monica Mountains. In undertaking the study, the conservancy shall cooperate with the National Park Service, the El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park Advisory Committee, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the City of Los Angeles.

(b) The executive director of the conservancy shall file by June 30, 1983, with the Secretary of State and the City Council of the City of Los Angeles a map showing a feasible recreational trail corridor between El Pueblo de Los Angeles State Historic Park and Griffith Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 634, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.7.

On January 1, 1984, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall transfer Fryman Canyon, which was acquired pursuant to Section 4 of Chapter 809 of the Statutes of 1980, to the conservancy. Fryman Canyon shall be deemed to have been acquired by the conservancy pursuant to Section 33204, but may be transferred by the conservancy only to the National Park Service, without payment of any compensation, in accordance with Section 33205.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1280, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.8.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding the requirements in Section 33105.5, if the conservancy determines, based on relevant scientific information and land use planning studies and after holding at least one public hearing in the area that would be affected by a revision of the boundaries of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor, that a boundary revision within and in the vicinity of the City of Moorpark, as described in paragraph (2), is necessary, the executive director shall prepare and file with the Secretary of State, the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water a revised map showing the changes in the boundaries of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor.

(2) The conservancy shall determine
 potential boundary revisions of the Rim of the Valley Trail Corridor for the area within the city limits of the City of Moorpark; the area north of the city limits and south of Broadway Road between Happy Camp Canyon Regional Park and Grimes Canyon Road; and the area west of the city limits of the City of Moorpark, south of Los Angeles Avenue, north of the Arroyo Simi, and east of the Gabbert Canyon Drainage Channel.

(3) A revised map prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be supported by relevant scientific information and shall be in accordance with the purposes and objectives of Section 33204.3.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 33201, this section does not affect the jurisdiction of the State Coastal Conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 208.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

33205.

The conservancy shall not hold lands acquired in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 33204 more than 10 years from the time of acquisition. A city, county, recreation and park district, the National Park Service, or a state agency may acquire the land any time during that period for park, recreation, or resource preservation purposes. The acquisition price to the agencies shall be based upon the cost of acquisition under this division, plus administrative and management costs in reserving the land, unless the conservancy determines that the agency will operate and maintain the property for park, recreation, or resource preservation purposes in accordance with standards set by the conservancy, and that the property will not be converted to other uses without the approval of the conservancy. In the cases where the conservancy makes this determination, it may transfer the property without consideration or it may set another acquisition price as mutually agreed upon by the parties. However, in any case where there is a transfer without consideration, or where the consideration is less than acquisition and administrative and management costs, the property shall first be offered to the Department of Parks and Recreation, and, if the department is unwilling or unable to accept the property, the conservancy may then transfer or sell the property to a city, county, recreation and park district, or the National Park Service pursuant to this section. The conservancy shall include in each instrument transferring title of state property to the National Park Service a provision which assures that the property is operated in a manner suitable for park, recreation, or resource preservation purposes. The conservancy shall include in each instrument transferring title of state property to a state or local agency a provision for reversion of the property to the state if the property ceases to be used for park, recreation, or resource preservation purposes. Lands acquired under subdivision (d) of Section 33204 shall not be disposed of pursuant to Section 11011.1 of the Government Code.

If, at the expiration of the 10-year period, no agency is willing or able to acquire the lands, the conservancy shall request the Real Estate Services Division of the Department of General Services to dispose of the lands at fair market value subject to restrictions that are consistent with this division.

Any funds received by the state upon disposition of lands acquired in accordance with subdivision (a) or (d) of Section 33204 shall be deposited in the fund and shall be available for the purposes of this division. Any funds received by the state under this section upon disposition of lands acquired with funds granted pursuant to Section 507(n) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 460kk(n)) shall be deposited in the federal grant account in the fund and shall be available for the purposes of this division when authorized by the Secretary of the Interior.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1549, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

33205.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, concurrent with the transfers described in subdivision (b), the Department of Parks and Recreation shall transfer Stunt Ranch, which was acquired pursuant to Section 3 of Chapter 1305 of the Statutes of 1980, to the conservancy, and Stunt Ranch shall be deemed to have been acquired by the conservancy pursuant to Section 33204. Subject to the approval of the Director of Parks and Recreation, the conservancy, not sooner than January 1, 1986, may transfer in fee only to the National Park Service to be used for the benefit of the state park system, without payment of compensation, in accordance with Section 33205 of the Public Resources Code, that portion of Stunt Ranch not transferred to the regents pursuant to subdivision (c), subject to rights reserved to the regents by subdivision (c). If operating funds for Stunt Ranch become available to the Department of Parks and Recreation prior to a transfer to the National Park Service, the conservancy shall, upon the request of the Director of Parks and Recreation, retransfer the property, without payment of compensation, to the Department of Parks and Recreation and the property shall be operated as a unit of the state park system, subject to rights reserved to the regents by subdivision (c).

(b) If the conservancy acquires property of the regents commonly known as “362 acres more or less in Upper Temescal Canyon” (hereafter called Upper Temescal Canyon) and “40 acres more or less in Arroyo Sequit” (hereafter called Arroyo Sequit property), the executive director, on behalf of the conservancy, shall do the following:

(1) Transfer Upper Temescal Canyon to the Department of Parks and Recreation as an addition to Topanga State Park.

(2) Offer to transfer, without compensation, the Arroyo Sequit property to the Department of Parks and Recreation for state park system purposes. If the department does not accept the offer of the Arroyo Sequit property within a reasonable time, the conservancy may transfer the Arroyo Sequit property in fee to the National Park Service to be used for the benefit of the state park system, without payment of compensation, in accordance with Section 33205.

(c) If the conservancy acquires the properties specified in subdivision (b) by March 1, 1984, the executive director of the conservancy shall transfer in fee that portion of Stunt Ranch as may be needed by the regents for scientific and educational purposes, upon terms mutually agreed upon by the executive director, on behalf of the conservancy, and the regents. The Department of General Services shall appraise Upper Temescal Canyon, the Arroyo Sequit property, and the Stunt Ranch property and the costs of the appraisal shall be borne equally by the conservancy and the regents. The executive director, on behalf of the conservancy, the Director of Parks and Recreation, and the regents shall each certify that the properties transferred to and offered to the Department of Parks and Recreation pursuant to subdivision (b) are of equivalent value to that portion of Stunt Ranch transferred to the regents pursuant to this subdivision. Subject to the approval of the Director of Parks and Recreation, the executive director shall also execute an agreement with the regents, which shall be effective upon execution, for the use of such other areas of Stunt Ranch as may be necessary for scientific and educational purposes. The agreement may provide that any transfer of other portions of Stunt Ranch to the National Park Service or to the Department of Parks and Recreation shall reserve to the regents the right to continue scientific and educational use under substantially the same conditions as existed prior to the transfer.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that the transfers of and reservations of rights in, property provided for by this section are in the public interest, further the objectives of, and benefit, the state park system, and further the interest in protecting the Santa Monica Mountains Zone as declared in Section 33001.

(e) In the event of any conflict between Sections 92671 to 92673, inclusive, of the Education Code and this section, the provisions of this section shall prevail.

(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and any other provision of law, the executive director of the conservancy may take such actions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1280, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

33206.

The conservancy may lease lands acquired in accordance and for purposes consistent with this division. Revenue from leases of land acquired with funds granted pursuant to Section 507(n) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 460kk(n)) shall be deposited in the federal grant account in the fund and shall be available for the purposes of this division when authorized by the Secretary of the Interior. When leases are made to private individuals or private nonprofit tax-exempt organizations of lands acquired pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 33204, the conservancy shall annually, upon appropriation of such amounts by the Legislature, transfer 24 percent of the gross income of such leases to the county in which such lands are situated.

The county shall distribute any payment received by it pursuant to this section to itself, to each revenue district for which the county assesses and collects real property taxes or assessments, and to every other taxing agency within the county in which the property is situated. The amount distributable to the county and each such revenue district or other taxing agency shall be proportionate to the ratio which the amount of the taxes and assessments of each on similar real property similarly situated within that part of the county embracing the smallest in the area of the revenue districts or other taxing agencies other than the county, levied for the fiscal year next preceding, bears to the combined amount of the taxes and assessments of all such districts and agencies, including the county, on such property levied for that year. The county auditor shall determine and certify the amount distributable to the board of supervisors, which shall thereupon order the making of the distribution.

Any money distributed pursuant to this section to any county, revenue district, or other taxing agency shall be deposited to the credit of the same fund as any taxes or assessments on any taxable similar real property similarly situated. 

Where a county receives a payment pursuant to this section in an amount of twenty-five dollars ($25) or less in respect to any parcel of leased property, all of such payment shall be distributed to the county for deposit in the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33207.

(a) Areas offered for open-space dedication or trail easement by any person, and lands offered for sale because of tax delinquency, shall not be lost to public use if they are necessary to meet any of the provisions of this division. The conservancy shall serve as a repository for these lands and interest in land and for this purpose may accept dedication of fee title, easements, development rights, or other interests.

(b) The conservancy shall have the first right of refusal on any property within the zone presently owned by a public agency and scheduled for disposal as excess lands, except where such lands are designated for acquisition as a park or recreation area by a federal, state, or local agency. The conservancy shall have the right to acquire such lands at the disposing agency’s purchase price plus any administrative and management costs incurred by the disposing agency. The disposing agency shall have the right of first refusal to reacquire property which was acquired by the conservancy pursuant to this division at the price paid by the conservancy before any administrative costs incurred by the conservancy when the land is not to be used for the purposes of this division and is to be sold by the Real Estate Services Division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33207.1.

(a) The conservancy shall, upon the request of a city or county, waive subdivision (b) of Section 33207 if it finds any of the following:

(1) The property is shown as commercial or manufacturing on the general plan, area plan, or local coastal program of the city or county having jurisdiction, whichever is applicable, on the date of enactment of this section at the 1985–86 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(2) The property is within the unincorporated area of a county with a population exceeding 4,000,000 and is to be used for affordable housing, as determined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52020 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Nothing in this division requires any local agency to declare any property surplus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1048, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 1985.   Operative January 1, 1986, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1048.)
-------------------------------------------

33207.5.

(a) The executive director, on behalf of the conservancy, shall, contemporaneously with the Los Angeles Unified School District completing all procedures and transfers in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c), waive and release all the conservancy’s right, title, or interest to purchase Los Angeles Unified School District property pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33207, and pursuant to any other statutory authority, wherever granted, to those school sites commonly referred to as the Beverly Glen Midsite School site, the property commonly referred to as the four recorded lots of the Old Ranch Road School site, the property commonly referred to as the South of Lanai Road School site, and any other school district properties located within the zone, except that the conservancy shall retain all rights to purchase the acreage parcel of the Old Ranch Road School site as set forth in this section.

(b) The exemption in subdivision (a) shall become operative if the Board of Education of the Los Angeles Unified School District, referred to in this section as the Board of Education, within two days of the effective date of this section, votes to offer to the conservancy, and within five days of the effective date of this section records in the office of the Los Angeles County Recorder, an irrevocable offer to sell to the conservancy, at the original purchase price, the Temescal Junior High School site; and records in the office of the Los Angeles County Recorder an offer of a right to purchase to the conservancy upon terms and procedures in accordance with subdivision (d), a portion of the Old Ranch Road site described as follows:

All that portion of blocks 39 and 43 lying within the Santa Monica Land and Water Company Tract M.R. 78-44/49 owned by the Los Angeles Unified School District, together with appurtenant access easements along Old Ranch Road.

(c) The exemption in subdivision (a) shall only become operative if the Board of Education, within two days of the effective date of this section, approves a resolution of intention to sell the Old Ranch Road site described in subdivision (b). The resolution to sell shall direct publication of notice of the Board of Education’s intention to sell in a newspaper of general circulation published within the Los Angeles Unified School District within 10 days of the resolution and shall cause the notice to be published on at least three occasions within a period of time of not less than 15 days. The notice shall fix a date for the opening of bids not less than 21 days after the last publication. The bids shall be opened in public in the offices of the real estate branch in accordance with the Los Angeles Unified School District’s procedure. The executive director of the conservancy shall be advised of the bid opening and location not less than seven days prior thereto. The resolution to sell and notice shall state a minimum bid price of one million four hundred thousand dollars ($1,400,000) cash sale, and close of escrow to occur within 45 days of acceptance of the highest responsible bid by the Board of Education. All bids shall be in writing and accompanied by a deposit of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in cash or cashier’s check.

(d) (1) Prior to accepting any responsible bid received pursuant to subdivision (c), the Board of Education or its designee shall call for oral bids. If, upon the call for oral bidding, any person offers to purchase the property upon the terms and conditions specified in the resolution, for a price exceeding by at least 5 percent the highest written or previous oral proposal that is made by a responsible person, that higher bid shall be designated as the highest responsible bid if the oral bid is reduced to writing and signed by the offeror and accompanied by a cashier’s check or by cash in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) After determining the highest responsible bidder, the Board of Education shall offer the Old Ranch Road School site described in subdivision (b) to the conservancy at the price indicated in the highest responsible bid as determined in subdivision (c) and this subdivision, but at a price not less than one million four hundred thousand dollars ($1,400,000). The offer shall be in writing and shall remain open for a period of 10 days from the date that the written offer is received by the conservancy. The executive director of the conservancy shall have the right, against all others, to gain the right to purchase the property at any time within the 10-day period at the price of the highest responsible bid by communicating to the Board of Education in writing.

(3) In the event the executive director of the conservancy exercises the right to purchase pursuant to this section, the State of California, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, shall receive a conveyance of the property from the Board of Education by quit claim deed if the State of California pays the Board of Education by warrant or by cashier’s check, the amount of the highest bid at any time within a six-month period commencing with the date of the receipt by the executive director of the conservancy of the Board of Education’s offer, as described in this subdivision.

(4) If the executive director of the conservancy does not, within the 10-day period described in this subdivision, indicate his or her intention to exercise the right to purchase the property, the Board of Education may convey the property to the highest responsible bidder. In the event the highest responsible bidder fails to complete the purchase, the Board of Education shall offer the property to the executive director of the conservancy in accordance with the procedure set forth in this subdivision for each successive responsible bid, but in no case shall the price to the conservancy be less than one million four hundred thousand dollars ($1,400,000).

(5) Should the executive director of the conservancy indicate an intention to exercise the right to purchase within the 10-day period, but fail to pay the Board of Education the purchase price by warrant of the State of California or cashier’s check within the six-month period, or the executive director of the conservancy fails to exercise the right to purchase within the 10-day period and the property is purchased by the highest responsible bidder, the executive director of the conservancy shall execute a waiver and release in accordance with subdivision (a) for the Old Ranch Road site as described in subdivision (b).

(e) (1) In the event the conservancy does not acquire the portion of the Old Ranch Road site described in subdivision (b) pursuant to the procedure set forth in this section, and the conservancy has released and waived its rights pursuant to subdivision (a), the Board of Education may offer the Old Ranch Road site for purchase to the highest responsible bidder on the same terms as determined pursuant to this section, or should the responsible bidder no longer wish to purchase the property, the Board of Education may offer the property for sale pursuant to the provisions of the Education Code governing the sale of surplus district property.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Education may adopt or approve any and all acts required by it to carry out this section and may sell to the conservancy the real property described as the Temescal Junior High School site at its original purchase price in accordance with the procedures specified in this section by an affirmative vote of five members of the Board of Education. Further, notwithstanding the provisions of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and any other provision of law, the executive director of the conservancy may take any actions that are necessary to carry out this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 599.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

33207.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon receipt of a resolution of the Board of Education of the Las Virgenes Unified School District, the conservancy shall exchange for the district, under terms mutually agreed upon by the district and the conservancy, an acceptable substitute property for excess school lands within the zone now held by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 999, Sec. 3.5.   Effective September 29, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

33207.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, upon mutual agreement of the conservancy and the governing body of each local government or special district, conservancy funds provided to that jurisdiction and proceeds of sales of excess properties acquired from that jurisdiction shall be spent for purposes consistent with open-space purposes within any area of that jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1616, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

33208.

The conservancy shall annually, beginning on January 1, 1981, transmit to the Governor and the Legislature a two-part report as follows:

(a) The first part of the report shall include all of the following:

(1) A listing of, and justification for, the projects proposed to be undertaken pursuant to Section 33204, a statement of the condition of the fund, and a certification by the conservancy that each of the projects proposed to be funded are consistent with the plan.

(2) A priority listing of the projects that shall be developed after public hearings and findings and with local government coordination.

(3) A listing of the amount of money necessary, if any, to retire bonded indebtedness for water and sewer and other utilities already incurred by property owners which, if left outstanding, would contribute to further development of the zone in a manner inconsistent with the plan. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the conservancy may make grants from the fund to retire that bonded indebtedness from any money specifically granted by the Secretary of the Interior for that purpose.

(b) The second part of the report shall include all of the following:

(1) A schedule of projects undertaken by the conservancy and a schedule of grants and loans made by the conservancy.

(2) The program specified in Section 33204 under which each project, grant, or loan was carried out and the manner and extent to which the goals of the project, grant, or loan, and the goals of this division, were achieved and the actual cost thereof, including an accounting.

(3) A schedule of grants awarded to the conservancy and the disposition of the funds granted.

(4) The disposition of the funds appropriated to the conservancy in the fiscal year preceding the year in which the report is made.

(5) A review of local and state government actions taken to implement the plan.

(6) An identification of additional funding, legislation, or other resources required which would more effectively enable the conservancy or local governments to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1304, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

33209.

Every project submitted for funding pursuant to Section 33208 shall have an adopted project plan developed by, or in coordination with, the applicable local government or other state agency. The conservancy shall by regulation specify the content of project plans. Maximum public participation shall be afforded in the development of project plans, including public hearings and findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------

33210.

Upon the request of a city, county, or recreation and park district within the zone, upon the request of the National Park Service, or on its own initiative, the conservancy may, after public hearings and findings, and consistent with this division, amend the plan and submit it to the Secretary of the Interior for approval. However, if the conservancy acts on its own initiative to substantially amend the plan, the action shall be subject to the same procedure for obtaining a resolution of intent to comply with the plan from the affected jurisdiction as applied to the original approval of the plan pursuant to Section 507(n)(3)(B) of the National Parks and Recreation Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. 460kk(n)(3)(B)). The findings shall provide that the amendments to the plan will not adversely affect the health, safety, or welfare of persons residing in the zone or of persons using the facilities located within the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 999, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

33211.

The conservancy may:
